Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Chapter 4

Election Officials

2-4-101. Officials conducting elections.

All elections shall be held by election officials appointed under this title.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-401.

Attorney General Opinions. A city is solely responsible for the costs of the special election to fill the vacancy in a council seat and cannot seek to recover those costs from the resigning member, OAG 07-169 (12/21/07).

2-4-102. Appointment of election officials and inspectors.

Not more than ninety (90) days nor less than ten (10) days before each election, the county election commission shall appoint the following minimum number of election officials to hold elections at each polling place: one (1) officer of elections, and three (3) judges. Two (2) of the judges appointed hereunder shall concurrently serve as precinct registrars, in accordance with § 2-12-202. In precincts where voting machines are used, any judge not appointed to serve as a precinct registrar shall concurrently serve as a machine operator for that polling place. Additional precinct registrars and machine operators may be appointed in accordance with § 2-4-105 as necessary to adequately staff the polling place. One (1) machine operator may be appointed to operate no more than two (2) voting machines.

Except for the officer of elections, the county election commission may provide that an appointment applies to a specific term that begins or expires at designated times during the election day.

The county election commission may appoint for election day as many inspectors as it may deem necessary.

If a statewide political party has no member on the county election commission and there is not at least one (1) election official appointed from its nominees under § 2-4-106 for each polling place for which it nominates officials, the county election commission shall, on request of the party's county primary board, appoint from that party's nominees under § 2-4-106 one (1) inspector for every thirty thousand (30,000) people in the county according to the 1970 federal census or any later federal census but not less than two (2) inspectors or more than ten (10).

Inspectors represent the commission in its investigation of the conduct of elections. Inspectors shall report any irregularities to the county election commission and the county election commission shall promptly rule on the objections.

No inspector may serve on election day who has not received the instruction provided under § 2-4-108.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 274, § 1; 1979, ch. 306, § 2; T.C.A., § 2-402; Acts 1991, ch. 131, § 1; 1997, ch. 558, § 26; 1999, ch. 197, § 3; 2011, ch. 412, §§ 2, 3; 2013, ch. 231, § 4; 2017, ch. 15, § 1; 2020, ch. 655, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “ninety (90) days” for “sixty (60) days” in (a).

The 2020 amendment added (a)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 15 § 3. March 24, 2017.

Acts 2020, ch. 655, § 7. April 2, 2020.

2-4-103. Residence and age qualifications of election officials.

Officers of elections, judges, machine operators, precinct registrars and assistant precinct registrars shall be registered voters and shall reside in the county in which they are appointed to serve.

Inspectors shall be registered voters at a polling place in the county and shall be inhabitants of the county.

In counties having a population of less than six hundred thousand (600,000) according to the federal census of 1970 or any later federal census, the county election commission may appoint persons as precinct registrars who shall be registered voters at a polling place in the county and shall be inhabitants of the county.

In counties having a metropolitan form of government, the county election commission may appoint persons as precinct registrars who shall be registered voters at a polling place within each legislative district.

Inspectors shall be registered voters at a polling place in the legislative district in those counties having a metropolitan form of government.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a county election commission may appoint as an election official a person who has reached sixteen (16) years of age and who meets all other requirements to serve. This section does not prohibit a high school student appointed as a poll official from receiving compensation in addition to having an excused absence.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-403; Acts 1980, ch. 804, § 1; 2000, ch. 756, § 7; 2001, ch. 413, §§ 7, 8; 2003, ch. 374, § 1; 2011, ch. 167, § 1; 2020, ch. 655, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (e), substituted “sixteen (16)” for “seventeen (17)” in the first sentence and “This section does not prohibit” for “Nothing in this section shall prohibit” in the second sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 655, § 7. April 2, 2020.

2-4-104. Judges to be of different political parties.

Not more than two (2) of the judges at a polling place may be of the same political party, if persons from different political parties are willing to serve. When primary elections are being held, at least one (1) judge shall be appointed from each party having a primary at the polling place for which the judges are being appointed.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-404.

2-4-105. Election officials and inspectors — Limitation on number from same party — Exception.

As nearly as practicable, no more than one half (½) of the number of election officials at a polling place and no more than one half (½) of the whole number of inspectors may be members of the same political party. In applying the rule of this section to inspectors, inspectors whose appointment is required by § 2-4-102 shall not be counted.

In the event that only one (1) political party elects to hold a primary election as authorized under § 2-13-203, then only members of that political party who call the primary shall be appointed to serve at the polls as election officials as required by this title.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1974 ch. 448, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-405.

2-4-106. Nominations for appointments as election officials — Appointment by commission.

Each county primary board shall, and each county executive committee may, nominate persons for appointment as election officials, including precinct and assistant precinct registrars.

The county election commission shall appoint such nominees as election officials to meet the requirements of §§ 2-4-102, 2-4-104 and 2-4-105, but when there is an inadequate number of nominees, the county election commission may nominate as many additional persons as may be necessary for appointment.

The nominations made pursuant to this section shall be made thirty (30) days prior to the appointment time, except that this subsection (c) does not apply to counties with a metropolitan form of government.

The county election commission of any county may refuse to appoint any person nominated hereunder if the members of the county election commission of the political party for which the person was appointed are of the opinion that:

Such person is incompetent to hold elections;

Such person failed to serve as directed in previous elections; or

Such person is otherwise, in their opinion, unfit to serve in the election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1974, ch. 642, §§ 2, 4; 1979, ch. 306, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-406; Acts 2014, ch. 724, § 1.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment deleted “such person has been appointed to hold elections previously and” following “nominated hereunder if” in the introductory paragraph of (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 724, § 12. April 16, 2014.

2-4-107. Notice of appointment — Form.

The secretary of the county election commission or the administrator of elections shall notify each official of such official's appointment by mail or email in substantially the following form:

To

You have been appointed by the County Election Commission as a (state in what capacity — judge, etc.) to hold the election at precinct , on the day of , between the hours of a.m. and p.m. If you cannot serve, notify the administrator of elections immediately.

Date

Secretary, County Election Commission/Administrator of Elections

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-407; Acts 1988, ch. 933, §§ 2, 3; 1997, ch. 558, § 27; 2018, ch. 842, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment inserted “or email” in the introductory language.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 842, § 6. April 26, 2018.

2-4-108. Instruction of election officials — Compensation.

The coordinator of elections shall create minimum standards for educating election officials throughout the state for use by the county election commissions. The standards shall include instructing election officials as to their duties during an election and educating the officials about the election laws of this state.

After the appointment of the election officials pursuant to § 2-4-102, there shall be held in each county, under the direction of the county election commission, at least one (1) instructional meeting for the purpose of training election officials as to their duties during an election. The meeting shall at a minimum meet the standards created pursuant to subsection (a).

The officials for each polling place shall attend the instructional meeting and shall receive, for the time spent in receiving such instructions and qualifying to serve at an election by taking the oath, the sum of ten dollars ($10.00), which is to be paid only if they serve in the election. The compensation may be increased by resolution of the county legislative body.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, the county election commission may limit attendance at instructional meetings to only those persons who are inexperienced or otherwise need the training.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-408; Acts 1980, ch. 915, § 1; 1981, ch. 338, § 1; 1981, ch. 385, § 4; 1988, ch. 683, § 1; 2008, ch. 1099, § 1; 2012, ch. 1101, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1980, ch. 915, § 2 provided that the state's share of the cost of the 1980 amendment increasing the compensation of election officials “shall be funded from the increase in state imposed taxes which are earmarked to cities and counties and which are not designated to be used by such cities and counties for a particular purpose.”

This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

2-4-109. Compensation paid officials for services.

Officers of elections, judges, machine operators, and inspectors shall be paid for their services on election day a minimum of fifty dollars ($50.00). Compensation for such persons shall be paid as soon as possible after the election. The compensation may be increased by the county legislative body.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), a person may volunteer to provide services under subsection (a) without compensation.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1977, ch. 469, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-409; Acts 1999, ch. 197, § 4; 2001, ch. 413, § 5; 2008, ch. 928, § 8; 2017, ch. 15, § 2.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 15 § 3. March 24, 2017.

2-4-110. Filling vacancies — Notice of appointment.

If a county election commission determines that an official whom it has appointed cannot serve, the commission shall appoint a registered voter of the county to fill the vacancy and shall give the voter notice of such appointment.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-410; Acts 1988, ch. 933, § 4; 1997, ch. 558, § 28; 1999, ch. 197, § 5.

2-4-111. Administration of oaths.

The officers of elections may administer oaths in the performance of their duties.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1215.